North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159G. Water Infrastructure.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 159G-24.
Fee imposed on a loan or grant from Water Infrastructure Fund.

A loan awarded from the Water Infrastructure Fund is subject to a fee of two percent (2%) of the loan. A grant awarded from the Water Infrastructure Fund is subject to a fee of one and one-half percent (1 1/2%) of the grant. The fee is payable when a loan or grant is awarded.

Departmental Receipt. — The fee on a loan from the Water Infrastructure Fund is a departmental receipt and must be applied to the Department’s and the Local Government Commission’s costs in administering loans from these Reserves. The Department and the Local Government Commission must determine how to allocate the fee receipts between their agencies. The fee on a grant from the Water Infrastructure Fund is a departmental receipt of the Department and must be applied to the Department’s costs in administering grants from these Reserves.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2012-142, s. 12.01.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 12.01, effective July 1, 2012, substituted “Water Infrastructure Fund” for “Wastewater Reserve or the Drinking Water Reserve” throughout the section; and, in subsection (a), substituted “two percent (2%)” for “two and one-half percent (2 1/2%)”.

§ 159G-25.
Expenditure for emergency corrective action at a wastewater treatment works.

The Department may use revenue in any account of the Wastewater Reserve to provide funds for emergency corrective action at a wastewater treatment works under the circumstances set out in this section. The amount expended in a fiscal year for corrective action under this section may not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000). An expenditure for emergency corrective action is authorized only under the following circumstances:

A person holding a wastewater discharge or nondischarge permit issued under Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is violating the terms of the permit.

The wastewater treatment works operated under the permit has a design flow capacity of no more than 100,000 gallons a day.

The Department has given the permit holder written notice of the violation.

The permit holder refuses to take the action required to comply with the permit.

The inaction by the permit holder poses a threat to public health.

The Department has informed the permit holder in writing that the Department plans to take emergency corrective action and then bring a civil action against the permit holder to recover the cost of the emergency corrective action.

The Department may bring a civil action against the holder of the permit for the wastewater treatment works to recover the amount expended from the Wastewater Reserve for the emergency corrective action. The amount recovered in a civil action must be credited to the account in the Wastewater Reserve from which the funds were expended.

History.

2005-454, s. 3.

§ 159G-25.5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-241, s. 11(a), effective November 6, 2019.

History.

2019-226, s. 1; repealed by 2019-241, s. 11(a), effective November 6, 2019.

Editor’s Note.

Former

G.S. 159G-25.5

pertained to emergency expenditure for operating deficits incurred by certain public water systems and wastewater systems.

§ 159G-26.
Annual reports on Water Infrastructure Fund.

Requirement. — The Department shall publish a report each year on the accounts in the Water Infrastructure Fund that are administered by the Division of Water Infrastructure. The report shall be published by November 1 of each year and cover the preceding fiscal year. The Department shall make the report available to the public and shall give a copy of the report to the Environmental Review Commission, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division with the report required by

G.S. 159G-72

as a single report.

Content. — The report required by this section must contain the following information concerning the accounts of the Water Infrastructure Fund:

The beginning and ending balance of the account for the fiscal year.

The amount of revenue credited to the account during the fiscal year, by source.

The total amount of loans and grants awarded from the account, by type, and the amount of any expenditure for emergency corrective action made from the account.

For each loan or grant awarded, the recipient of the award, the amount of the award, the amount of the award that was disbursed, and the amount of the award remaining to be disbursed in a subsequent fiscal year.

The amount disbursed for loans and grants awarded but not disbursed in a prior fiscal year and the amount remaining to be disbursed in a subsequent fiscal year.

An assessment of the expected impact on water quality and water supply of the projects for which the loans and grants were awarded.

History.

2005-454, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 13.3(iii); 2013-360, s. 14.21(f); 2013-413, s. 57(s); 2014-115, s. 17; 2017-10, s. 4.17(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(o), provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes may conform names and titles changed by this section and may correct statutory references as required by this section throughout the General Statutes.” Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes made conforming changes in this section.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.3(iii), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Division of Water Resources” for “Division of Environmental Health” in the second sentence of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(f), effective July 1, 2013, in subsection (a), substituted “Infrastructure” for “Quality or the Division of Water Resources” in the first sentence and substituted “Legislative Services Commission” for “General Assembly” at the end of the last sentence.

Session Laws 2013-413, s. 57(s), deleted “Division of Water Quality or the” preceding “Division of Water” in the first sentence of subsection (a). For effective date, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2017-10, s. 4.17(a), effective May 4, 2017, substituted “shall” for “must” wherever it appears; in the second sentence, substituted “Commission, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, and the” for “Commission and the”; substituted “Division with the report required by

G.S. 159G-72

as a single report” for “Division of the Legislative Services Commission”; and made a stylistic change.

§§ 159G-27 through 159G-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.